Hawaii statutes.
§712-1270.3 Citizen's rights. Any
citizen who brings a nuisance abatement suit against a place used for the
purpose of committing:

(1) Fireworks related offenses contained in section
132D-14(a)(1) or (3); or

(2) Drug offenses under part IV of this chapter or
who files a complaint with the local police or drug nuisance abatement unit of
the department of the attorney general,

shall be entitled to the same rights and protections
of victims and witnesses in criminal proceedings in accordance with chapter 801D.
[L 2004, c 44, §25; am L 2010, c 136, §5]

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next